Hawaii statutes.
§448H-4 Meetings. The board shall meet
not less than twice a year at a time and place as determined by the board. The
board shall also meet but not later than thirty days prior to the licensing
examination pursuant to section 448H-5(2) in order to evaluate applications
therefor. Any board member who misses two consecutive meetings of the board or
fifty per cent of the meetings in a year shall be removed from the board. [L
1971, c 190, pt of §1; am L 1979, c 217, §3; am L 1982, c 204, §8; am L 1983, c
36, §3; am L 1992, c 202, §87; am L 1993, c 6, §22]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next